Connecticut, session 2026, HB05554.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 4-170 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There shall be a standing legislative committee to review all
regulations of the several state departments and agencies following the
proposal thereof, which shall consist of eight members of the House of
Representatives, [four from each major party,] to be appointed on the
first Wednesday after the first Monday in January in the odd-numbered
years, by the [speaker of said House] appointing authority, and six
members of the Senate, [three from each major party,] to be appointed
on or before said dates by the [president pro tempore of the Senate]
appointing authority. The number of major party and minor party
members of the Senate shall be in proportion to the number of members
of such party in the Senate, and the number of major party and minor
LCO No. 3038 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5554
party members of the House of Representatives shall be in proportion
to the number of such party members in the House of Representatives.
The members shall serve for the balance of the term for which they were
elected. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the authority
making the appointment. There shall be two cochairpersons, one of
whom shall be a member of the Senate and one of whom shall be a
member of the House of Representatives, each appointed by the
applicable appointing authority. [, provided the cochairpersons shall
not be members of the same political party and shall be from alternate
parties in the respective houses in each successive term.] For purposes
of this section, "appointing authority" means the speaker [or minority
leader] of the House of Representatives and the president pro tempore
[or minority leader] of the Senate, as appropriate according to the
respective house [and party] of the member to be appointed. Each
chairperson may call meetings of the committee for the performance of
its duties.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 4-189i of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) Not later than July 1, 2017, and not later than every seven years
thereafter, each committee of cognizance, in consultation with each
agency that is within the cognizance of the committee, shall establish the
date by which each such agency shall submit a review of its existing
regulations and shall notify the administrator of the regulation review
committee of each such date and any extension thereof. In establishing
such date, or any extension of the date that may be requested by the
agency, the committee of cognizance (1) shall consider the volume and
complexity of such regulations and the personnel and other resources
of the agency that would be available to undertake the review within
the agency's available appropriations, and (2) may establish a schedule
of dates for the review of various portions of such regulations upon the
agreement of the committee of cognizance and the administrative head
of the agency. Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter,
LCO No. 3038 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5554
each agency shall provide a written report concerning the status of such
review to the committee of cognizance, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a. Such report may contain a summary of the
regulations that the agency intends to amend or repeal.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 4-170(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 4-189i(a)